Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.097

Department of children, youth, and families—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of children, youth, and families to the secretary, the secretary's personal secretary, and any other exempt staff members provided for in RCW 43.216.025(2).

[ 2018 c 58 s 6; 2006 c 265 s 110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.